Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2003
County officers; removal by judicial proceedings; procedure.

The proceedings shall be as nearly like those in other actions as the nature of the case admits, excepting where otherwise provided in sections 23-2001 to 23-2009.

R.S.1866, c. 45, § 3, p. 298;

R.S.1913, § 5700;

C.S.1922, § 5030;

C.S.1929, § 26-1703;

R.S.1943, § 23-2003.